Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3242.4 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year, an individual


who is from a country that is designated by the United States


Department of State as a country of particular concern shall not be


eligible to enroll in an institution of higher education within The


Oklahoma State System of Higher Education.


B. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall


promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.



Req. No. 3556 Page 1


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3556 EB 12/29/2025 1:09:03 PM





































Req. No. 3556 Page 2